src/fst/affixes/enclitics.lexc
LEXICON Si_Se
si+Conj+Coord#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
si+Adv#se+Conj+Subord: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#se+Conj+Subord: # ;

si+Conj+Coord#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Adv#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

si+Conj+Coord#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Adv#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Si_En
si+Conj+Coord#en+Prep: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#en+Prep: # ;
si+Adv#en+Prep: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#en+Prep: # ;

si+Conj+Coord#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
si+Pro+Poss+3s+Masc+Nom+Pl+Unstress#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
si+Adv#en+Pro+Adv: # ;
si+Conj+MultiWordConj+Subord#en+Pro+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Se_Le
se+Conj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
se+Conj+Subord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
se+Conj+Subord#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress: # ;

LEXICON Se_Les
se+Conj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Nom+Pl: # ;

se+Conj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Fem+Obl+Pl: # ;

se+Conj+Subord#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3s+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;
se+Pro+Prs+3p+Refl+Obl+Unstress#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Pl: # ;


!!€gt-norm: misc_verbs
!!€ jol:    je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#le+Art+Def+Masc+Obl+Sg
!!€ jol:    je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Masc+Obl+Dir+Unstress
!!€ jol:    je+Pro+Prs+1s+Nom+Stress+Gram/Early#il+Pro+Prs+3s+Neut+Obl+Unstress
